Texas, session 891, HB267.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 28.002(a), Education Code, is amended to read as follows: (a)  Each school district that offers kindergarten through grade 12 shall offer, as a required curriculum: (1)  a foundation curriculum that includes: (A)  English language arts; (B)  mathematics; (C)  science; and (D)  social studies, consisting of Texas, United States, and world history, government, economics, with emphasis on the free enterprise system and its benefits, and geography; and (2)  an enrichment curriculum that includes: (A)  to the extent possible, languages other than English; (B)  health, with emphasis on: (i)  physical health, including the importance of proper nutrition and exercise; (ii)  mental health, including instruction about mental health conditions, substance abuse, skills to manage emotions, establishing and maintaining positive relationships, and responsible decision-making; [and] (iii)  suicide prevention, including recognizing suicide-related risk factors and warning signs; and (iv)  instruction that human life begins at conception and has inherent dignity and immeasurable worth from the moment of conception; (C)  physical education; (D)  fine arts; (E)  career and technology education; (F)  technology applications; (G)  religious literature, including the Hebrew Scriptures (Old Testament) and New Testament, and its impact on history and literature; and (H)  personal financial literacy. SECTION 2.  This Act applies beginning with the 2026-2027 school year. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.